Missouri, session 2026, HB2621.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.307 and 285.550, RSMo, are repealed, to read as follows:
[67.307. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Law enforcement officer", a sheriff or peace officer of a
municipality with the duty and power of arrest for violation of the general
criminal laws of the state or for violation of ordinances of municipalities;
(2) "Municipality", any county, city, town, or village;
(3) "Municipality official", any elected or appointed official or any law
enforcement officer serving the municipality;
(4) "Sanctuary policy", any municipality's order or ordinance, enacted
or followed that:
(a) Limits or prohibits any municipality official or person employed by
the municipality from communicating or cooperating with federal agencies or
officials to verify or report the immigration status of any alien within such
municipality; or
(b) Grants to illegal aliens the right to lawful presence or status within
the municipality in violation of federal law.
2. No municipality shall enact or adopt any sanctuary policy. Any
municipality that enacts or adopts a sanctuary policy shall be ineligible for any
moneys provided through grants administered by any state agency or
department until the sanctuary policy is repealed or is no longer in effect.
Upon the complaint of any state resident regarding a specific government
entity, agency, or political subdivision of this state or prior to the provision of
funds or awarding of any grants to a government entity, agency, or political
subdivision of this state, any member of the general assembly may request that
the attorney general of the state of Missouri issue an opinion stating whether
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2621 2
the government entity, agency, or political subdivision has current policies in
contravention of this section.
3. The governing body, sheriff, or chief of police of each municipality
shall provide each law enforcement officer with written notice of their duty to
cooperate with state and federal agencies and officials on matters pertaining to
enforcement of state and federal laws governing immigration.
4. This section shall become effective on January 1, 2009.]
[285.550. If any municipal or county governing body fails to suspend
the business permit, if such exists, and applicable licenses or exemptions as
directed by the attorney general as a result of a violation of section 285.530 or
285.535 within fifteen days after notification by the attorney general, the
municipality shall be deemed to have adopted a sanctuary policy as defined in
section 67.307 and shall be subject to the penalties thereunder.]
✔